Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 8, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20H), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20H. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class B3
shall include the following criminal offenses:
1. Embezzlement of state property by a public officer of the
state or any county, city, town, or member or officer of the
Legislature, deputy, or clerk, as provided for in Section 341 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
2. Burning, destroying, or injuring any public building, as
provided for in Section 349 of Title 21 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
3. Resisting or aiding in resisting the execution of process,
as provided for in Section 539 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;


Req. No. 15314 Page 2

4. Domestic abuse with a prior pattern of physical abuse, as
provided for in Section 644.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
5. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an intimate
partner or a family or household member with any sharp or dangerous
weapon, as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection D of Section
644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
6. Assault and battery against a current or former intimate
partner or a family or household member that results in great bodily
injury to the victim, as provided for in subsection F of Section 644
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
7. Second or subsequent conviction for assault and battery by
strangulation or attempted strangulation against an intimate partner
or a family or household member, as provided for in subsection J of
Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
8. Second or subsequent conviction for committing or attempting
to commit a felony while wearing body armor, as provided for in
Section 1289.26 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
9. Riotous assembly for the purpose of resisting the execution
of any statute or obstructing any public officer, as provided for in
paragraph 2 of Section 1312 Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title;
10. Carrying at the time of a riot any firearm or other deadly
weapon or being disguised while participating in a riot, as provided
Req. No. 15314 Page 3

for in paragraph 3 of Section 1312 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
11. Directing, advising, encouraging, or soliciting other
persons to use force or violence while participating in a riot, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 1312 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
12. Arson with the intent to injure or defraud the insurer, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 1403 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
13. Forgery in the first degree, as provided for in Section
1561 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
14. Forgery of stock certificates or securities, as provided
for in Section 1562 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
15. Fraudulently uttering one's signature on any instrument as
that of another with the same name, as provided for in Section 1622
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
16. Fraudulently uttering one's endorsement on any negotiable
instrument as that of another with the same name, as provided for in
Section 1623 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
17. Total or partial erasure or obliteration of any instrument
or writing with intent to defraud, as provided for in Section 1624
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


Req. No. 15314 Page 4

18. Signing fictitious name as an officer or agent of a
corporation, as provided for in Section 1626 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
19. Procuring, soliciting, selling, or receiving more than ten
(10) telephone records by fraudulent, deceptive, or false means, as
provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection B of Section 1742.2 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
20. Violating the Viatical Settlements Act of 2008, as provided
for in paragraph 1 of subsection F of Section 4055.14 of Title 36 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Third or subsequent conviction of driving under the
influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance, as provided
for in paragraph 4 of subsection C H of Section 11-902 of Title 47
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. Driving under the influence with a blood or breath alcohol
concentration of fifteen-hundredths (0.15) or more, as provided for
in subsection D I of Section 11-902 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
23. Injuring, destroying, or attempting to injure or destroy
any hazardous liquid transportation system, as provided for in
Section 47.6 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
24. Bringing into or having in his or her possession in any
jail, state penal institution, or other place where prisoners are
located, any gun, knife, bomb, other dangerous instrument,
Req. No. 15314 Page 5

cont rolled dangerous substance, alcoholic beverage, money, or
financial documents, as provided for in subsection A of Section 21
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
25. Purchasing or attempting to purchase, receive, or otherwise
acquire any product, mixture, or preparation containing any
detectable quantity of base pseudoephedrine or ephedrine after a
conviction of manufacturing or attempting to manufacture
methamphetamine, as provided for in paragraph 5 of subsection G of
Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
26. Distributing, other than by dispensing, a Schedule I or
Schedule II controlled dangerous substance, in the course of
legitimate business, as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection A
of Section 2-406 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
27. Using a fictitious, revoked, suspended, or fraudulent
registration number in the course of manufacturing or distributing a
controlled dangerous substance, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 2-406 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
28. Furnishing false or fraudulent material information in, or
omitting any material information from, any application, report, or
document required by the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances
Act, as provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 2-406
of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. Making, distributing, or possessing any punch, die, plate,
stone, or other thing designed to print, imprint, or reproduce the
Req. No. 15314 Page 6

trad emark, trade name, or other identifying mark, upon any drug,
container, or labeling, as provided for in paragraph 5 of subsection
A of Section 2-406 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
30. Trafficking twenty-five (25) pounds or more of marijuana,
as provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection C of
Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
31. Trafficking twenty-eight (28) grams or more of cocaine,
coca leaves, or cocaine base, as provided for in subparagraph a of
paragraph 2 of subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
32. Trafficking three hundred (300) grams or more of cocaine,
coca leaves, or cocaine base, as provided for in subparagraph b of
paragraph 2 of subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
33. Trafficking ten (10) grams or more of heroin, as provided
for in subparagraph a of paragraph 3 of subsection C of Section 2-
415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Trafficking twenty (20) grams or more of amphetamine or
methamphetamine, as provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 4 of
subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. Trafficking two hundred (200) grams or more of amphetamine
or methamphetamine, as provided for in subparagraph b of paragraph 4
of subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
Req. No. 15314 Page 7

36. Trafficking one (1) gram or more of lysergic acid
diethylamide (LSD), as provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 5
of subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
37. Trafficking twenty (20) grams or more of phencyclidine
(PCP), as provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 6 of
subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
38. Trafficking thirty (30) tablets or ten (10) grams of 3,4-
Methylenedioxy methamphetamine, as provided for in subparagraph a of
paragraph 7 of subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
39. Aggravated trafficking one hundred (100) tablets or thirty
(30) grams of 3,4-Methylenedioxy methamphetamine, as provided for in
subparagraph b of paragraph 7 of subsection C of Section 2-415 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
40. Trafficking one thousand (1,000) grams or more of morphine,
as provided for in paragraph 8 of subsection C of Section 2-415 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
41. Trafficking four hundred (400) grams or more of oxycodone,
as provided for in paragraph 9 of subsection C of Section 2-415 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
42. Trafficking three thousand seven hundred fifty (3,750)
grams or more of hydrocodone, as provided for in paragraph 10 of
subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
Req. No. 15314 Page 8

43. Trafficking five hundred (500) grams or more of
benzodiazepine, as provided for in paragraph 11 of subsection C of
Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
44. Trafficking one (1) gram or more of fentanyl or
carfentanyl, as provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 12 of
subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
45. Employing, hiring, or using an individual under fifteen
(15) years of age to unlawfully transport, carry, sell, give away,
prepare for sale, or peddle any controlled dangerous substance, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 2-419.1 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
46. Second or subsequent conviction for violating the Vessel
and Motor Chop Shop, Stolen and Altered Property Act, as provided
for in subsection J of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
47. Third or subsequent conviction for violating the Vessel and
Motor Chop Shop, Stolen and Altered Property Act, as provided for in
subsection J of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class B3 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 9, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 187, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 20I), is amended to read as follows:
Req. No. 15314 Page 9

Section 20I. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class B4
shall include the following criminal offenses:
1. Concealing the birth or death of a child, as provided for in
Section 53 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
2. Assault, battery, or assault and battery with a sharp or
dangerous weapon, as provided for in Section 645 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
3. Robbery in the second degree, as provided for in Section 799
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
4. Neglecting a vulnerable adult, as provided for in subsection
A of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
5. Malicious harassment of another person based on that
person's race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, or
disability, as provided for in Section 850 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
6. Abandonment of a child under ten (10) years of age, as
provided for in Section 851 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
7. Abandonment of a wife or child under fifteen (15) years of
age, as provided for in Section 853 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
8. Second or subsequent conviction for causing, aiding,
abetting, encouraging, soliciting, or recruiting a minor to
participate, join, or associate with a criminal street gang, as
Req. No. 15314 Page 10

prov ided for in subsection E of Section 856 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
9. Incest, as provided for in Section 885 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
10. Crime against nature, as provided for in Section 886 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
11. Taking or enticing away any child under sixteen (16) years
of age with the intent to detain or conceal such child, as provided
for in Section 891 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
12. Indecent exposure, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection A of Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
13. Procuring, counseling, or assisting another to commit an
act of indecent exposure, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
14. Preparing, publishing, selling, distributing, downloading
on a computer, or exhibiting obscene material or child pornography,
as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 1021 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
15. Preparing, selling, giving, loaning, distributing, or
exhibiting any type of obscene material or child pornography, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1021 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
Req. No. 15314 Page 11

16. Operating, owning, or maintaining a house of prostitution,
soliciting, enticing, or procuring another for prostitution, or
transporting or assisting in the transport of another for
prostitution purposes, as provided for in Section 1028 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
17. Engaging in prostitution or soliciting, inducing, enticing,
or procuring another to commit an act of prostitution, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1029 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
18. Purchasing, selling, or distributing obscene material or
child pornography, as provided for in Section 1040.13 Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
19. Encouraging, offering, or soliciting sexual conduct with a
minor by use of technology, as provided for in Section 1040.13a of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
20. Promoting a pyramid promotional scheme, as provided for in
Section 1073 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
21. Second or subsequent offense of permitting prostitution in
any house, building, room, or premises under the control of such
person, as provided for in Section 1086 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
22. Offering or offering to secure a child under eighteen (18)
years of age for the purpose of prostitution, as provided for in

Req. No. 15314 Page 12

para graph 1 of subsection A of Section 1087 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
23. Knowingly permitting the prostitution of a child under
eighteen (18) years of age by an owner, proprietor, manager,
conductor, or other person in any house, place, building, room, or
other premises under the control of such person, as provided for in
paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section 1087 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
24. Taking a woman against her will to compel her by force or
duress to marry another, as provided for in Section 1118 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
25. Abduction of a child under fifteen (15) years of age for
the purpose of marriage, concubinage, or any crime involving moral
turpitude, as provided for in Section 1119 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
26. Sexual battery, as provided for in subsection B of Section
1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
27. Indecent acts with a human corpse, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
28. Desecration of a human corpse, as provided for in Section
1161.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


Req. No. 15314 Page 13

29. Stalking within ten (10) years of a prior conviction for
stalking, as provided for in subsection D of Section 1173 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
30. Interfering with, molesting, or assaulting firefighters in
the performance of their duties, as provided for in Section 1217 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
31. Concealment of hazardous waste, as provided for in Section
1230.7 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
32. Criminal syndicalism, as provided for in Section 1261 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
33. Sabotage, as provided for in Section 1262 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
34. Advocating or teaching criminal syndicalism or sabotage, as
provided for in Section 1263 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
35. Destroying, interfering, hindering, or tampering with real
or personal property with intent to hinder, delay, or interfere with
preparations for defense or for war, as provided for in Section
1265.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
36. Make or cause defects with any article or thing with
reasonable grounds to believe such article or thing will be used for
defense or for war, as provided for in Section 1265.3 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

Req. No. 15314 Page 14

37. Conspiracy to commit crimes provided in the Sabotage
Prevention Act, as provided for in Section 1265.5 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
38. Terrorism hoax, as provided for in Section 1268.4 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
39. Engaging in terrorist activity by manufacturing, sending,
delivering, or possessing any toxic, noxious, or lethal substances,
chemical, biological, or nuclear materials, as provided for in
Section 1268.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
40. Conducting or attempting to conduct financial transactions
involving property related to terrorism, as provided for in Section
1268.7 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
41. Using a money services business or an electronic funds
transfer in violation of the Oklahoma Antiterrorism Act, as provided
for in Section 1268.8 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title;
42. Possession of a firearm by a convicted felon, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
43. Possession of a firearm by a person serving a term of
probation for a felony or who is subject to supervision, probation,
parole, or inmate status, as provided for in subsection C of Section
1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

Req. No. 15314 Page 15

44. Possession of a firearm by a person previously adjudicated
as a delinquent child or youthful offender, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
45. Possession of a firearm by a person who is an alien
illegally or unlawfully in the United States, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
46. Allowing a convicted felon, adjudicated delinquent, or
youthful offender to possess a pistol authorized for use under the
Oklahoma Self-Defense Act by a person who has a handgun license, as
provided for in subsection F of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
47. Use of a firearm or other offensive weapon while committing
a felony, as provided for in Section 1287 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
48. Pointing a firearm, as provided for in Section 1289.16 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
49. Manufacturing, importing, or selling restricted bullets, as
provided for in Section 1289.20 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
50. Possessing, carrying, or using or attempting to use against
another person any restricted bullets, as provided for in Section
1289.21 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
Req. No. 15314 Page 16

51. Committing a felony while wearing body armor, as provided
for in Section 1289.26 Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
52. Carrying a stolen handgun, as provided for in subsection B
of Section 1290.21 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
53. Incitement to riot, as provided for in Section 1320.2 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
54. Malicious destruction or damage to real or personal
property or malicious injury to another during a state of emergency,
as provided for in Section 1321.7 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
55. Participating in a riot during a state of emergency, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1321.8 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
56. Causing an innocent or irresponsible person to engage in a
riot, as provided for in subsection E of Section 1321.8 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
57. Possession of explosives by a convicted felon, as provided
for in Section 1368 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
58. Attempting, conspiring, or endeavoring to perform an act of
violence, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1378 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
59. Devising a plan, scheme, or program of action to cause
serious bodily harm or death of another person, as provided for in

Req. No. 15314 Page 17

subs ection C of Section 1378 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
60. Endangering any human life including emergency service
personnel while committing an act of arson, as provided for in
Section 1405 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
61. Intimidating, threatening, assaulting, or battering any
driver, attendant, guard, or passenger of a bus with intent to seize
the bus, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1903 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
62. Discharging any firearm into or within any bus, terminal,
or other transportation facility, as provided for in subsection D of
Section 1903 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
63. Leaving the scene of a vehicle accident that resulted in
the death of a person, as provided for in Section 10-102.1 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
64. Second felony conviction of driving under the influence of
alcohol or other intoxicating substance, as provided for in
paragraph 3 of subsection C H of Section 11-902 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
65. Causing an accident resulting in the death of another
person while operating a vehicle without a valid driver license, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 11-905 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 15314 Page 18

66. Throwing or dropping any substance at a moving vehicle, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 11-1111 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
67. Throwing or dropping any object from a bridge or overpass
with intent to damage property or injure a person, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 11-1111 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
68. Manufacturing, selling, transferring, or furnishing a
precursor substance to another with knowledge the recipient will use
such substance to unlawfully manufacture a controlled substance, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 2-328 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
69. Second or subsequent conviction for manufacturing, selling,
transferring, furnishing, or receiving a precursor substance, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 2-328 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
70. Purchasing, obtaining, possessing, manufacturing, selling,
or transferring a precursor substance without a permit or making a
false statement in an application or report, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 2-328 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
71. Selling, transferring, distributing, or dispensing any
product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine to another with knowledge the purchaser will use
such product as a precursor to manufacture methamphetamine or
Req. No. 15314 Page 19

anot her controlled illegal substance, as provided for in Section 2-
333 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
72. Cultivating, producing, or knowingly permitting the
cultivation or production of any species of plants from which
controlled dangerous substances may be derived, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 2-509 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
73. Manufacturing or attempting to manufacture any controlled
dangerous substance by cooking, burning, or extracting and
converting marihuana or marihuana oil into hashish, hashish oil, or
hashish powder, as provided for in subsection H of Section 2-509 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
74. Purchasing or possessing any quantity of pseudoephedrine by
a person who is subject to the Oklahoma Methamphetamine Offender
Registry Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 2-701 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
75. Using an explosive or blasting agent with the intent to
kill, injure, or intimidate a person or unlawfully damage real or
personal property, as provided for in subsection B of Section 124.8
of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class B4 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.


Req. No. 15314 Page 20

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 13, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024, as amended by Section 6, Chapter 187, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 20M), is amended to read as follows:
Section 20M. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class C2
shall include the following criminal offenses:
1. Theft of anhydrous equipment, as provided for in subsection
B of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Branding, misbranding, marking, or mismarking any domestic
animal with intent to defraud, as provided for in Section 268 of
Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Injuring, destroying, or attempting to injure or destroy any
pipeline transportation system, as provided for in subsection C of
Section 6.1 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Embezzlement by a county treasurer or other officer, as
provided for in Section 641 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Giving or offering any bribe to an executive officer, as
provided for in Section 265 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
6. Receiving or agreeing to receive a bribe by an executive
officer or person elected or appointed to an executive office, as
provided for in Section 266 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
7. Entry into a restricted area of a building or grounds using
or carrying a deadly or dangerous weapon or firearm or engaging in
Req. No. 15314 Page 21

acts of violence that result in great bodily injury, as provided for
in paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 282 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
8. Forcefully or fraudulently preventing the Legislature from
meeting or organizing, as provided for in Section 301 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
9. Forcefully or fraudulently compelling or attempting to
compel the Legislature to adjourn or disperse, as provided for in
Section 303 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
10. Compelling or attempting to compel either house of the
Legislature to pass, amend, or reject any bill or resolution, grant
or refuse any petition, or to perform or omit to perform any other
official act, as provided for in Section 305 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
11. Offering to give a bribe to any member of the Legislature
in order to influence the member in giving or withholding a vote, as
provided for in Section 308 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
12. Asking, receiving, or agreeing to receive any bribe by a
member of the Legislature, as provided for in Section 309 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
13. Entering a fort, magazine, arsenal, armory, arsenal yard,
or encampment and seizing or taking away arms, ammunition, military

Req. No. 15314 Page 22

stor es, or supplies belonging to the state, as provided for in
Section 350 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
14. Carrying, causing to be carried, or publicly displaying any
red flag or other emblem or banner indicating disloyalty to the
Government of the United States, as provided for in Section 374 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
15. Bribery by a fiduciary, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 380 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
16. Bribery of a fiduciary, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 380 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
17. Commercial bribery of an insured depository institution or
credit union, as provided in Section 380.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
18. Accepting or requesting a bribe by public officers or
employees of this state, as provided for in Section 382 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
19. Offering or giving a bribe to any judicial officer, as
provided for in Section 383 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
20. Attempting to influence a juror, as provided for in Section
388 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
21. Conspiracy to commit a felony, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 421 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
Req. No. 15314 Page 23

22. Conspiring to commit any act against the peace of the state
by two or more persons outside of the state, as provided for in
Section 422 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
23. Conspiring to commit any act against the state by two or
more persons, as provided for in Section 424 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
24. Attempting to avoid a roadblock by failing to stop, passing
by or through such roadblock without permission, as provided for in
Section 540B of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
25. Fraudulently producing an infant in order to intercept the
inheritance or distribution of any personal estate or real estate,
as provided for in Section 578 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
26. Maiming by inflicting upon one's self any disabling injury,
as provided for in Section 752 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
27. Financial exploitation of an elderly or disabled adult with
funds, assets, or property valued at One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) or less, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection
B of Section 843.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
28. Conducting gambling games, as provided for in Section 941
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


Req. No. 15314 Page 24

29. Using a house, room, or place to conduct gambling games, as
provided for in Section 946 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
30. Engaging or participating in gambling games by a public
officer, as provided for in Section 948 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
31. Commercial gambling, as provided for in Section 982 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
32. Letting premises for the purpose of betting on races or
receiving, registering, recording, or forwarding any money or thing
of value to a racetrack for betting purposes, as provided for in
paragraphs 2 through 6 of subsection A of Section 991 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
33. Using the terms "prize" or "gift" in a manner that is
untrue or misleading, as provided for in Section 996.3 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
34. Advocating criminal syndicalism, sabotage, or the
necessity, propriety, or expediency of doing any act of physical
violence or unlawful act as a means of accomplishing any industrial
or political ends, change, or revolution, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1327 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;


Req. No. 15314 Page 25

35. Arson in the fourth degree by attempting to set fire to or
burn any building or property, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1404 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
36. Delivering to another any merchandise for which any bill of
lading, receipt, or voucher has been issued and the value of the
property is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 1416 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
37. Burglary in the second degree by breaking and entering into
any commercial building or by breaking and entering into a coin-
operated or vending machine, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1435 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
38. Embezzlement of property valued at Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection B
of Section 1451 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
39. Embezzlement by a county or state officer, as provided for
in subsection C of Section 1451 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
40. False personation of another, as provided for in Section
1531 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
41. Receiving money or property intended for another with a
value of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided
for in paragraph 4 of Section 1532 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
Req. No. 15314 Page 26

42. Use of a motor vehicle or motor-driven cycle for the
purpose of falsely impersonating a law enforcement officer which
causes another person to be injured, defrauded, harassed, vexed, or
annoyed, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection F of Section
1533 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
43. Obtaining, attempting to obtain, or presenting to a
financial institution personal, financial, or other information of
another person, as provided for in Section 1533.2 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
44. Obtaining property by trick, deception, or by means of a
false or bogus check and the property value is Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
subsection A of Section 1541.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
45. Making, drawing, uttering, or delivering two or more false
or bogus checks and the value is Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection A
of Section 1541.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
46. Selling, exchanging, or delivering any forged or
counterfeited promissory note, check, bill, draft, or other evidence
of debt knowing the same is forged or counterfeited and the value of
the instrument is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1577 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
Req. No. 15314 Page 27

47. Possession of any forged, altered, or counterfeited
negotiable note, bill, draft, or other evidence of debt and the
value of the instrument is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or
more, as provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1578
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
48. Possession of any forged or counterfeited instrument with
intent to injure or defraud and the value of the instrument is
Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1579 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
49. Uttering or publishing as true any forged, altered, or
counterfeited instrument or counterfeit coins and the value of the
instrument is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1592 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
50. Exhibiting false, forged, or altered books, papers,
vouchers, security, or other instruments of evidence to any public
officer or board with intent to deceive, as provided for in Section
1632 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
51. Destroying, altering, mutilating, or falsifying any books,
papers, writing, or securities belonging to a corporation or
association with intent to defraud, as provided for in Section 1635
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

Req. No. 15314 Page 28

52. Larceny of lost property and the value of the property is
Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph 4 of Section 1702 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
53. Grand larceny and the value of the property is Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph
4 of subsection A of Section 1705 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
54. Grand larceny in any dwelling house or vessel, as provided
for in Section 1707 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
55. Larceny of any evidence of debt or other written
instrument, as provided for in Section 1709 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
56. Buying or receiving any property that has been stolen,
embezzled, or obtained by false pretense or robbery and has a value
of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 1713 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
57. Buying or receiving any construction equipment or farm
equipment that has been stolen, embezzled, or obtained by false
pretense or robbery, as provided for in Section 1713.1 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


Req. No. 15314 Page 29

58. Bringing into this state the stolen property of another
obtained from another state or country, as provided for in Section
1715 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
59. Larceny of livestock or implement of husbandry, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1716 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
60. Larceny of a dog, as provided for in Section 1718 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
61. Grand larceny of exotic livestock, as provided for in
Section 1719.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
62. Larceny of an aircraft, automobile, construction equipment,
or farm equipment, valued at Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or
more, as provided for in Section 1720 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
63. Tapping or drilling into a pipeline, as provided for in
Section 1721 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
64. Taking any crude oil or gasoline from any pipe, pipeline,
tank, tank car, or other receptacle or container and the value of
such product is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 1722 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
65. Larceny of merchandise from a retailer or wholesaler and
the value of the goods is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or

Req. No. 15314 Page 30

more , as provided for in paragraph 5 of subsection A of Section 1731
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
66. Larceny of trade secrets that is valued at Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section 1732 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
67. Procuring, soliciting, selling, or receiving by fraudulent,
deceptive, or false means two to ten telephone records without
authorization, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of
Section 1742.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
68. Masking, altering, or removing any locomotive or railway
car lights or signals, as provided for in Section 1778 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
69. Mutilating, tearing, defacing, obliterating, or destroying
any written instrument, value of Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section 1779 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
70. Violations of the Oklahoma Computer Crimes Act, as provided
for in paragraphs 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 9, or 10 of subsection A of Section
1953 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
71. Contracting the sale of rights arising from a criminal act
without providing for the forfeiture of the proceeds, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 17 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;

Req. No. 15314 Page 31

72. Violating any of the provisions of the Oklahoma Clean Air
Act knowing that the violation places others in danger of death or
serious bodily injury, as provided for in subsection B of Section 2-
5-116 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
73. Violating any of the provisions of the Oklahoma Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System Act knowing that the violation places
others in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury, as
provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 3 of subsection G of
Section 2-6-206 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
74. Soliciting or accepting any bribe or money by a game warden
in connection with the performance of his or her duties as a game
warden, as provided for in subsection E of Section 3-201 of Title 29
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
75. Taking or enticing away an incapacitated or partially
incapacitated person or person for whom a guardian has been
appointed without consent of the guardian, as provided for in
Section 4-904 of Title 30 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
76. Violating any of the provisions of the Viatical Settlements
Act of 2008 if the value of the viatical settlement contract is more
than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) but not more than
Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00), as provided for in
paragraph 2 of subsection F of Section 4055.14 of Title 36 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 15314 Page 32

77. Embezzlement of certain funds held in trust, value of
Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph (2) of Section 153 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
78. Providing any false statement of a material fact in an
application for a certificate of title, as provided for in Section
4-108 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
79. Altering or forging any certificate of title issued by the
Oklahoma Tax Commission, as provided for in Section 4-109 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
80. Perjury by making any false affidavit, as provided for in
Section 6-302 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
81. Creating, manufacturing, issuing, or selling security
verification forms, as provided for in subsection B of Section 7-612
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
82. Committing a subsequent violation of driving under the
influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance within ten (10)
years of being convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol
or other intoxicating substance, causing a personal injury accident
while driving under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating
substance, or driving under the influence of alcohol or other
intoxicating substance while transporting a child, as provided for
in paragraph 2 of subsection C H of Section 11-902 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 15314 Page 33

83. Operating a vehicle without a valid driver license for the
class of vehicle being operated and causing an accident resulting in
great bodily injury to another person, as provided for in subsection
B of Section 11-905 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
84. Operating a crusher without a proper license and receiving,
obtaining, or possessing any vehicle or property known to be stolen,
as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section 592.9 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
85. Selling a vehicle or other property to a crusher using
false or altered identification or making a false declaration of
ownership or lien status, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
subsection B of Section 592.9 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
86. Owning, operating, or conducting a chop shop, transporting
any motor vehicle or parts to or from a chop shop, or selling,
transferring, purchasing, or receiving any motor vehicle or parts to
or from a chop shop, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1503
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
87. Altering, counterfeiting, defacing, destroying, disguising,
falsifying, forging, obliterating, or knowingly removing a vehicle
identification number, as provided for in subsection B of Section
1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
88. Perjury by a public officer or employee who states as true
any material matter knowing it to be false, as provided for in
Section 36.5 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
Req. No. 15314 Page 34

89. Advocating by teaching, justifying, or becoming a member of
or affiliated with the Communist Party or with any other party or
organization that advocates for the revolution, sedition, treason,
or overthrow of the government of the United States or the State of
Oklahoma by a public officer or employee, as provided for in Section
36.6 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
90. Perjury by verifying under oath any report, map, or drawing
required to be filed with the Corporation Commission knowing that
such material is false, as provided for in Section 109 of Title 52
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
91. Asking, receiving, or agreeing to receive any gift or
gratuity by any member of the Corporation Commission, as provided
for in Section 118 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
92. Burglary in the first degree by a bail enforcer by breaking
into and entering the dwelling house of any defendant or third party
for purposes of recovery or attempted recovery of a defendant, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1350.6 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
93. Distributing, dispensing, transporting, or possessing a
controlled dangerous substance or soliciting a person less than
eighteen (18) years of age to cultivate, distribute, or dispense a
controlled dangerous substance, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 15314 Page 35

94. Creating, distributing, transporting, or possessing a
counterfeit controlled dangerous substance, as provided for in
paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
95. Manufacturing or distributing a controlled substance or
synthetic controlled substance, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection C of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
96. Larceny, burglary, or theft of a controlled dangerous
substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-403 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
97. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or subterfuge, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
98. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by forgery of, alteration of, or changing any information
on a prescription or any written order, as provided for in paragraph
2 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
99. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by the concealment of a material fact, as provided for in
paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 15314 Page 36

100. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by the use of a false name or false address, as provided
for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
101. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by failing to disclose the receipt or prescription of a
controlled dangerous substance of the same or similar therapeutic
use from another practitioner, as provided for in paragraph 5 of
subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
102. Manufacturing, creating, delivering, or possessing an
original prescription form or counterfeit prescription form, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
103. Receiving or acquiring proceeds known to be derived from
any violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 2-503.1 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
104. Knowingly or intentionally giving, selling, transferring,
trading, investing, concealing, transporting, or maintaining an
interest in anything of value which is intended to be used for
committing a violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 2-503.1
of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 15314 Page 37

105. Directing, planning, organizing, initiating, financing,
managing, supervising, or facilitating the transportation or
transfer of proceeds known to be derived from a violation of the
Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 2-503.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
106. Conducting a financial transaction involving proceeds
derived from a violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act for the purpose of concealing or disguising the
nature, location, source, ownership, or control of the proceeds
known to be derived from a violation of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act, as provided for in subsection D of Section
2-503.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
107. Encouraging, facilitating, or allowing access to any money
transmitter equipment for unlawful purposes, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 2-503.1d of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
108. Using a money services business or electronic funds
transfer network to facilitate any violation of the Uniform
Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, as provided for in Section 2-
503.1e of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
109. Structuring, assisting, or attempting to structure any
unlawful transaction with one or more financial or nonfinancial

Req. No. 15314 Page 38

trad es or businesses, as provided for in Section 2-503.1g of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
110. Altering, counterfeiting, defacing, destroying,
disguising, falsifying, forging, obliterating, or removing a hull
identification number of a vessel or motor, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
111. Commit or attempt to commit certain violations of the
Vessel and Motor Chop Shop, Stolen and Altered Property Act, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
112. Giving a false or bogus check in payment or remittance of
taxes, fees, penalties, or interest levied pursuant to any state tax
laws and the value of the false or bogus check is Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00) or more, as provided for in Section 218.1 of Title
68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
113. Perjury by providing false answers to any questions from
the Oklahoma Tax Commission or making or presenting any false
affidavit to be filed with the Oklahoma Tax Commission, as provided
for in Section 244 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
114. Perjury by verifying by oath, affirmation, or declaration,
any false report or false return that is to be filed with the
Oklahoma Tax Commission, as provided for in Section 246 of Title 68
of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 15314 Page 39

115. Making or manufacturing any tax stamp or falsely or
fraudulently forging, counterfeiting, reproducing, or possessing any
tax stamp, as provided for in subsection (a) A of Section 317 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
116. Offering or selling unregistered securities, as provided
for in Section 1-301 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
117. Issuing investment certificates when insolvent by an
investment certificate issuer, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection K of Section 1-308 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
118. Transacting business as a broker-dealer without being
registered as a broker-dealer, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1-401 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
119. Employing or associating with an individual for security
transaction purposes when the registration of the individual is
suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or
association with a broker-dealer, as provided for in subsection C of
Section 1-401 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
120. Transacting business as an agent without being registered
as an agent, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1-402 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
121. Employing or associating with an agent who transacts
business on behalf of broker-dealers when the agent is not
registered, as provided for in subsection D of Section 1-402 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
Req. No. 15314 Page 40

122. Conducting business on behalf of a broker-dealer when the
registration of the agent is suspended or revoked or the individual
is barred from employment or association with a broker-dealer, as
provided for in subsection F of Section 1-402 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
123. Transacting business as an investment adviser without
being registered as an investment adviser, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1-403 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
124. Employing or associating with an individual to engage in
providing investment advice when the registration of the individual
is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment
or association with an investment adviser, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1-403 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
125. Employing or associating with an individual required to be
registered as an investment adviser representative who is not
registered as an investment adviser representative, as provided for
in subsection D of Section 1-403 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
126. Transacting business as an investment adviser
representative without being registered as an investment adviser
representative, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1-404 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
127. Conducting business on behalf of an investment adviser or
federal-covered investment adviser when the registration of the
Req. No. 15314 Page 41

inve stment adviser representative is suspended or revoked or the
individual is barred from employment or association with an
investment adviser or federal-covered investment adviser, as
provided for in subsection E of Section 1-404 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
128. Employing a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud another
when offering, selling, or purchasing a security, as provided for in
paragraph 1 of Section 1-501 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
129. Making an untrue statement of a material fact or omitting
a material fact when offering, selling, or purchasing a security, as
provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 1-501 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
130. Engaging in an act, practice, or course of business that
operates as a fraud or deceit upon another person when offering,
selling, or purchasing a security, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
Section 1-501 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
131. Employing a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud another
when advising others for compensation as to the value of securities,
as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 1-502 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
132. Making an untrue statement of a material fact or omitting
a material fact when advising others for compensation as to the
value of securities, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection A
of Section 1-502 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
Req. No. 15314 Page 42

133. Engaging in an act, practice, or course of business that
operates as a fraud or deceit upon another person when advising
others for compensation as to the value of securities, as provided
for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 1-502 of Title 71 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
134. Making false or misleading statements in a record, as
provided for in Section 1-505 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
135. Making or causing to be made to a purchaser, customer,
client, or prospective customer or client, an inconsistent
representation, as provided for in Section 1-506 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
136. Willfully violating certain provisions of the Oklahoma
Uniform Securities Act of 2004, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1-508 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
137. Offering or selling any business opportunity without being
registered under the Oklahoma Business Opportunity Sales Act, as
provided for in Section 806 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
138. Offering or selling any business opportunity without a
written disclosure being filed, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 808 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
139. Offering or selling any business opportunity without a
business opportunity contract or agreement, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 809 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 15314 Page 43

140. Making or using any specific representations from the
Oklahoma Business Opportunity Sales Act without having a minimum net
worth of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for in
Section 811 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
141. Using information filed with or obtained by the
Administrator that is not public for the personal benefit of the
Administrator or any officers or employees of the Administrator, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 812 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
142. Employing any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud in
connection with offering or selling any business opportunity, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 819 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
143. Making any untrue statement of a material fact or omitting
a material fact in connection with offering or selling any business
opportunity, as provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 819 of Title
71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
144. Engaging in any act, practice, or course of business which
operates as a fraud or deceit in connection with offering or selling
any business opportunity, as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section
819 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
145. Making or causing to be made any false or misleading
statements or omitting to state a material fact necessary in any
document filed with the Administrator or in any proceeding pursuant
Req. No. 15314 Page 44

to t he Oklahoma Business Opportunity Sales Act, as provided for in
Section 820 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
146. Filing any application for registration that is false,
incomplete, or misleading, as provided for in Section 821 of Title
71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
147. Publishing, circulating, or using any advertising that
contains untrue statements of material facts or omits to state
material facts necessary, as provided for in Section 822 of Title 71
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
148. Taking or receiving any rebate, percentage of contract,
money, or any other thing of value by an officer of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services from any person, firm, or
corporation, as provided for in Section 71 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
149. Monopolizing, attempting to monopolize, or conspiring to
monopolize any part of trade or commerce, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 203 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
150. Discrimination in price between different purchasers of
commodities by any person engaged in commerce, as provided for in
Section 204 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
151. Violation of the Oklahoma Antitrust Reform Act, as
provided for in Section 206 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
152. Having any interest, directly or indirectly, in any
contract for the purchase of property or construction of work by or
Req. No. 15314 Page 45

for the Grand River Dam Authority by a director, officer, agent, or
employee, as provided for in Section 867 of Title 82 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
153. Using explosive agent to kill, injure, or intimidate or to
damage property, as provided for in subsection B of Section 124.8 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class C2 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than
seven (7) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the
sentence imposed before release from custody including release to
electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of
one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class C2
criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not
less than two (2) years nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve
at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed before release
from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to
Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three
Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class
A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class C2 criminal offense
Req. No. 15314 Page 46

shal l, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody
of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2)
years nor more than twelve (12) years and shall serve at least forty
percent (40%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody
including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of
this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title shall not apply to Class C2 criminal offenses.
E. 1. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 1, 2, 52, 53,
54, 55, 63, 65, 67, 68, 76, and 77 of subsection A of this section
shall be exempt from the penalty provisions provided for in
subsections B and C of this section. Persons convicted of the
criminal offenses provided for in paragraphs 1, 2, 52, 53, 54, 55,
63, 65, 67, 68, 76, and 77 of subsection A of this section shall be
punished in accordance with the corresponding penalties provided for
in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title.
2. The criminal offense listed in paragraph 64 of subsection A
of this section shall be exempt from the penalty provision provided
for in subsection B of this section. Persons convicted of the
criminal offense provided for in paragraph 64 of subsection A of
this section shall be punished in accordance with the corresponding
penalties as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section
Req. No. 15314 Page 47

51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title. The
provisions of subsection C of this section still applies to the
criminal offense listed in paragraph 64 of subsection A of this
section.
F. All Class C2 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the
corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-205, as
amended by Section 10, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 6-205), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-205. A. Service Oklahoma shall immediately revoke
the driving privilege of any person, whether adult or juvenile, upon
receiving a record of conviction, in any municipal, state or federal
court within the United States of any of the following offenses,
when such conviction has become final:
1. Manslaughter or negligent homicide resulting from the
operation of a motor vehicle;
2. Driving or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, any other intoxicating
substance, or the combined influence of alcohol and any other
intoxicating substance, any violation of paragraph 1, 2, 3, or 4 or
5 of subsection A or paragraphs 1 or 2 of subsection B of Section
11-902 of this title or any violation of Section 11-906.4 of this
title. However, Service Oklahoma shall not additionally revoke the
driving privileges of the person pursuant to this subsection if the
Req. No. 15314 Page 48

driv ing privilege of the person has been revoked because of a test
result or test refusal pursuant to Section 753 or 754 of this title
arising from the same circumstances which resulted in the conviction
unless the revocation because of a test result or test refusal is
set aside;
3. Driving a motor vehicle during the commission of a felony;
4. Failure to stop and render aid as required under the laws of
this state in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the
death or personal injury of another;
5. Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement
under oath to Service Oklahoma under the Uniform Vehicle Code or
under any other law relating to the ownership or operation of motor
vehicles;
6. A felony conviction for unlawfully distributing, dispensing,
manufacturing, trafficking, attempting or conspiring to distribute,
dispense, manufacture, or traffic a controlled dangerous substance
as defined in the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act while
driving a motor vehicle;
7. A misdemeanor conviction for a violation of Section 1-229.34
of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. Failure to obey a traffic control device as provided in
Section 11-202 of this title or a stop sign when such failure
results in great bodily injury to any other person; or

Req. No. 15314 Page 49

9. Failure to stop or to remain stopped for school bus loading
or unloading of children pursuant to Section 11-705 or 11-705.1 of
this title.
B. The first license revocation under any provision of this
section, except for paragraph 2, 3, 6, 7, or 9 of subsection A of
this section, shall be for a period of one (1) year. Such period
shall not be modified.
C. A license revocation under any provision of this section,
except for paragraph 2, 3, 6, or 7 of subsection A of this section,
shall be for a period of three (3) years if a prior revocation under
this section commenced within the preceding five-year period as
shown by the records of Service Oklahoma. Such period shall not be
modified.
D. The period of license revocation under paragraph 2, 3 or 6
of subsection A of this section shall be governed by the provisions
of Section 6-205.1 of this title.
E. The first license revocation under paragraph 7 of subsection
A of this section shall be for a period of six (6) months. Such
periods shall not be modified.
F. The first license revocation under paragraph 9 of subsection
A of this section shall be for a period of one (1) year. Such
period may be modified. Any appeal of the revocation of driving
privilege under paragraph 9 of subsection A of this section shall be

Req. No. 15314 Page 50

gove rned by Section 6-211 of this title; provided, any modification
under this subsection shall apply to Class D motor vehicles only.
G. As used in this section, "great bodily injury" means bodily
injury which creates a substantial risk of death or which causes
serious, permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of
the function of any bodily member or organ.
H. Any person whose driving privileges are or have been
canceled or denied pursuant to this section, except for paragraph 1,
2 or 8 of subsection A of this section, may file a petition for
relief based upon error or hardship.
1. The petition shall be filed in the district court which
notified Service Oklahoma. If the Notification originated in a
municipal court, the petition shall be filed in the district court
of the county in which the municipal court is located. A copy of
the Notification and a copy of Service Oklahoma's action canceling
or denying driving privileges pursuant to this section shall be
attached to the petition.
2. The district court shall conduct a hearing on the petition
and may determine the matter de novo, without notice to Service
Oklahoma and, if applicable, without notice to the municipal court;
provided, the district court shall not consider a collateral attack
upon the merits of any conviction or determination which has become
final.

Req. No. 15314 Page 51

3. The district court may deny the petition or, in its
discretion, issue a written Order to Service Oklahoma to decrease
the period of cancellation or denial to any period or issue a
written Order to vacate Service Oklahoma's action taken pursuant to
this section, in its entirety. The content of the Order shall not
grant or purport to grant any driving privileges to the person;
however, such Order may direct Service Oklahoma to do so if the
person is otherwise eligible therefor. The petitioner is
responsible for his or her own attorney fees. However, if the
petitioner is granted relief for error, then the party that
committed the error may be ordered to pay attorney fees and costs.
Unless all persons or agencies the court had reason to believe may
have had relevant information related to the court record and
departmental action have been given notice of the petition, attorney
fees and costs shall not be awarded against any party. In no event
shall Service Oklahoma be liable for attorney fees and costs for
suspending, revoking, canceling or denying a driver license based
upon reasonable reliance on a notice from a court requiring the
revocation, suspension, cancellation or denial of the driver license
according to law.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-902, as
amended by Section 33, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 11-902), is amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 15314 Page 52

Section 11-902. A. It is unlawful and punishable as provided
in this section for any person to drive, operate, or be in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state, whether upon
public roads, highways, streets, turnpikes, other public places or
upon any private road, street, alley or lane which provides access
to one or more single or multi-family dwellings, who:
1. Has a blood or breath alcohol concentration, as defined in
Section 756 of this title, of eight-hundredths (0.08) or more at the
time of a test of such person's blood or breath administered within
two (2) hours after the arrest of such person;
2. Is under the influence of alcohol;
3. Has any amount of a Schedule I chemical or controlled
substance, as defined in Section 2-204 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, or one of its metabolites or analogs in the person's
blood, saliva, urine or any other bodily fluid at the time of a test
of such person's blood, saliva, urine or any other bodily fluid
administered within two (2) hours after the arrest of such person;
4. Is under the influence of any intoxicating substance other
than alcohol which may render such person incapable of safely
driving or operating a motor vehicle; or
5. 4. Is under the combined influence of alcohol and any other
intoxicating substance which may render such person incapable of
safely driving or operating a motor vehicle.

Req. No. 15314 Page 53

B. A person commits the offense of driving under the influence
of a controlled substance if the person drives, operates or is in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state and:
1. The person has an active psychoactive substance present in
the person's blood, saliva or other bodily fluid within two (2)
hours after the arrest at or above the Tier 1 per se threshold
established in paragraph 2 of subsection D of this section; or
2. The person has a concentration of an active psychoactive
substance within the Tier 2 range as established in paragraph 3 of
subsection D of this section and the state presents additional
evidence of actual impairment, including, but not limited to,
erratic or unsafe driving behavior, performance on a Standardized
Field Sobriety Test, evaluation by a certified Drug Recognition
Expert, or video or testimonial evidence indicating diminished
ability to safely operate a motor vehicle.
C. The presence of a non-impairing metabolite, including, but
not limited to, Carboxy-THC or any other inactive metabolite of a
controlled substance, shall not constitute a per se violation of
this section and shall not be sufficient evidence to sustain a
conviction absent proof of impairment under subsections A or B of
this section.
D. 1. For the purposes of this section:
a. "active psychoactive substance" means Delta-9-
tetrahydrocannibinol (delta-9-THC) or any other
Req. No. 15314 Page 54

controlled substance in a form capable of producing
acute psychoactive or impairing effects, and
b. "non-impairing metabolite" means any metabolite or
chemical derivative of a controlled substance that
does not itself cause impairment and for which no
reliable correlation with impaired driving has been
established.
2. A person shall be presumed impaired if testing shows a
concentration of five nanogram per milliliter (5 ng/ml) or more of
active delta-9-THC in whole blood, or an equivalent scientifically
validated concentration in another approved bodily matrix. This
presumption shall be rebuttable.
3. A concentration between two nanograms per milliliter (2
ng/ml) and five nanogram per milliliter (5 ng/ml) of active delta-9-
THC in whole blood shall not constitute a per se offense, but may be
considered along with impairment evidence under subsection B of this
section.
4. The Oklahoma Board of Tests for Alcohol and Drug Influence
shall be authorized to promulgate rules adjust Tier 1 and Tier 2
thresholds consistent with new scientific research.
E. A registered medical marijuana patient may present evidence
of lawful therapeutic use and tolerance to rebut the presumption of
impairment under paragraph 3 of subsection D of this section.
Evidence may include medical authorization, dosage history, or
Req. No. 15314 Page 55

expe rt testimony. Nothing in his subsection shall prohibit
prosecution where independent evidence of impairment exists.
F. Chemical test results shall specify concentrations of active
THC, concentrations of inactive metabolites, and the timing of
sample collections. Defendants shall have the right to independent
testing.
G. The fact that any person charged with a violation of this
section is or has been lawfully entitled to use alcohol or a
controlled dangerous substance or any other intoxicating substance
shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this
section.
C. H 1. Any person who is convicted of a violation of the
provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for the
first offense and shall:
a. participate in an assessment and evaluation pursuant
to subsection G L of this section and shall follow all
recommendations made in the assessment and evaluation,
b. be punished by imprisonment in jail for not less than
ten (10) days nor more than one (1) year, and
c. be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00).
2. Any person who, having been convicted of or having received
deferred judgment for a violation of this section or a violation
pursuant to the provisions of any law of this state or another state
Req. No. 15314 Page 56

proh ibiting the offenses provided in this section, Section 11-904 of
this title or paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 852.1 of this
title, or having a prior conviction in a municipal criminal court of
record for the violation of a municipal ordinance prohibiting the
offense provided for in this section commits a subsequent violation
of this section within ten (10) years of the date following the
completion of the execution of said sentence or deferred judgment
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class C2 felony offense and
shall participate in an assessment and evaluation pursuant to
subsection G L of this section and shall be sentenced to:
a. follow all recommendations made in the assessment and
evaluation for treatment at the defendant's expense,
or
b. imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through
F of Section 20M of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
and a fine of not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00), or
c. treatment, imprisonment as provided for in subsections
B through F of Section 20M of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and a fine within the limitations prescribed
in subparagraphs a and b of this paragraph.
However, if the treatment in subsection G L of this section does
not include residential or inpatient treatment for a period of not

Req. No. 15314 Page 57

less than five (5) days, the person shall serve a term of
imprisonment of at least five (5) days.
3. Any person who commits a violation of this section after
having been convicted of a felony offense pursuant to the provisions
of this section or a violation pursuant to the provisions of any law
of this state or another state prohibiting the offenses provided for
in this section, Section 11-904 of this title or paragraph 4 of
subsection A of Section 852.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall be guilty of a Class B4 felony offense and participate in an
assessment and evaluation pursuant to subsection G L of this section
and shall be sentenced to:
a. follow all recommendations made in the assessment and
evaluation for treatment at the defendant's expense,
two hundred forty (240) hours of community service and
use of an ignition interlock device, as provided by
subparagraph n of paragraph 1 of subsection A of
Section 991a of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or
b. placement in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for not less than one (1) year and not to
exceed ten (10) years and a fine of not more than Five
Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or
c. treatment, imprisonment and a fine within the
limitations prescribed in subparagraphs a and b of
this paragraph.
Req. No. 15314 Page 58

However, if the treatment in subsection G L of this section does
not include residential or inpatient treatment for a period of not
less than ten (10) days, the person shall serve a term of
imprisonment of at least ten (10) days.
4. Any person who commits a violation of this section after
having been twice convicted of a felony offense pursuant to the
provisions of this section or a violation pursuant to the provisions
of any law of this state or another state prohibiting the offenses
provided for in this section, Section 11-904 of this title or
paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 852.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall be guilty of a Class B3 felony offense and
participate in an assessment and evaluation pursuant to subsection G
L of this section and shall be sentenced to:
a. follow all recommendations made in the assessment and
evaluation for treatment at the defendant's expense,
followed by not less than one (1) year of supervision
and periodic testing at the defendant's expense, four
hundred eighty (480) hours of community service, and
use of an ignition interlock device, as provided by
subparagraph n of paragraph 1 of subsection A of
Section 991a of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for
a minimum of thirty (30) days, or
b. placement in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for not less than one (1) year and not to
Req. No. 15314 Page 59

exceed twenty (20) years and a fine of not more than
Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or
c. treatment, imprisonment and a fine within the
limitations prescribed in subparagraphs a and b of
this paragraph.
However, if the person does not undergo residential or inpatient
treatment pursuant to subsection G L of this section the person
shall serve a term of imprisonment of at least ten (10) days.
5. Any person who, after a previous conviction of a violation
of murder in the second degree or manslaughter in the first degree
in which the death was caused as a result of driving under the
influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance, is convicted
of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class A2 felony
offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for not less than five (5) years and not
to exceed twenty (20) years, and a fine of not more than Ten
Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).
6. Provided, however, a conviction from another state shall not
be used to enhance punishment pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection if that conviction is based on a blood or breath alcohol
concentration of less than eight-hundredths (0.08).
7. In any case in which a defendant is charged with driving
under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance
offense within any municipality with a municipal court other than a
Req. No. 15314 Page 60

cour t of record, the charge shall be presented to the county's
district attorney and filed with the district court of the county
within which the municipality is located.
D. I. Any person who is convicted of a violation of driving
under the influence with a blood or breath alcohol concentration of
fifteen-hundredths (0.15) or more pursuant to this section shall be
deemed guilty of aggravated driving under the influence, a Class B3
felony offense. A person convicted of aggravated driving under the
influence shall participate in an assessment and evaluation pursuant
to subsection G L of this section and shall comply with all
recommendations for treatment. Such person shall be sentenced as
provided in paragraph 1, 2, 3, 4 or 5 of subsection C H of this
section and to:
1. Not less than one (1) year of supervision and periodic
testing at the defendant's expense; and
2. An ignition interlock device or devices, as provided by
subparagraph n of paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 991a of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for a minimum of ninety (90)
days.
E. J. When a person is sentenced to imprisonment in the custody
of the Department of Corrections, the person shall be processed
through the Lexington Assessment and Reception Center or at a place
determined by the Director of the Department of Corrections. The

Req. No. 15314 Page 61

Depa rtment of Corrections shall classify and assign the person to
one or more of the following:
1. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 612 of Title 57
of the Oklahoma Statutes; or
2. A correctional facility operated by the Department of
Corrections with assignment to substance abuse treatment.
Successful completion of a Department-of-Corrections-approved
substance abuse treatment program shall satisfy the recommendation
for a ten-hour or twenty-four-hour alcohol and drug substance abuse
course or treatment program or both. Successful completion of an
approved Department of Corrections substance abuse treatment program
may precede or follow the required assessment.
F. K. The Department of Public Safety is hereby authorized to
reinstate any suspended or revoked driving privilege when the person
meets the statutory requirements which affect the existing driving
privilege.
G. L. Any person who is found guilty of a violation of the
provisions of this section shall be ordered to participate in an
alcohol and drug substance abuse evaluation and assessment program
offered by a certified assessment agency or certified assessor for
the purpose of evaluating and assessing the receptivity to treatment
and prognosis of the person and shall follow all recommendations
made in the assessment and evaluation for treatment. The court
Req. No. 15314 Page 62

shal l order the person to reimburse the agency or assessor for the
evaluation and assessment. Payment shall be remitted by the
defendant or on behalf of the defendant by any third party;
provided, no state-appropriated funds are utilized. The fee for an
evaluation and assessment shall be the amount provided in subsection
C of Section 3-460 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes. The
evaluation and assessment shall be conducted at a certified
assessment agency, the office of a certified assessor or at another
location as ordered by the court. The agency or assessor shall,
within seventy-two (72) hours from the time the person is evaluated
and assessed, submit a written report to the court for the purpose
of assisting the court in its sentencing determination. The court
shall, as a condition of any sentence imposed, including deferred
and suspended sentences, require the person to participate in and
successfully complete all recommendations from the evaluation, such
as an alcohol and substance abuse treatment program pursuant to
Section 3-452 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes. If such report
indicates that the evaluation and assessment shows that the
defendant would benefit from a ten-hour or twenty-four-hour alcohol
and drug substance abuse course or a treatment program or both, the
court shall, as a condition of any sentence imposed, including
deferred and suspended sentences, require the person to follow all
recommendations identified by the evaluation and assessment and
ordered by the court. No person, agency or facility operating an
Req. No. 15314 Page 63

eval uation and assessment program certified by the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services shall solicit or refer
any person evaluated and assessed pursuant to this section for any
treatment program or substance abuse service in which such person,
agency or facility has a vested interest; however, this provision
shall not be construed to prohibit the court from ordering
participation in or any person from voluntarily utilizing a
treatment program or substance abuse service offered by such person,
agency or facility. If a person is sentenced to imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections and the court has received
a written evaluation report pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection, the report shall be furnished to the Department of
Corrections with the judgment and sentence. Any evaluation and
assessment report submitted to the court pursuant to the provisions
of this subsection shall be handled in a manner which will keep such
report confidential from the general public's review. Nothing
contained in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the
court from ordering judgment and sentence in the event the defendant
fails or refuses to comply with an order of the court to obtain the
evaluation and assessment required by this subsection. If the
defendant fails or refuses to comply with an order of the court to
obtain the evaluation and assessment, the Department of Public
Safety shall not reinstate driving privileges until the defendant
has complied in full with such order. Nothing contained in this
Req. No. 15314 Page 64

subs ection shall be construed to prohibit the court from ordering
judgment and sentence and any other sanction authorized by law for
failure or refusal to comply with an order of the court.
H. M. Any person who is found guilty of a violation of the
provisions of this section shall be required by the court to attend
a victims impact panel program, as defined in subsection H of
Section 991a of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, if such a program
is offered in the county where the judgment is rendered, and to pay
a fee of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00), as set by the governing
authority of the program and approved by the court, to the program
to offset the cost of participation by the defendant, if in the
opinion of the court the defendant has the ability to pay such fee.
I. N. Any person who is found guilty of a felony violation of
the provisions of this section shall be required to submit to
electronic monitoring as authorized and defined by Section 991a of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
J. O. Any person who is found guilty of a violation of the
provisions of this section who has been sentenced by the court to
perform any type of community service shall not be permitted to pay
a fine in lieu of performing the community service.
K. P. When a person is found guilty of a violation of the
provisions of this section, the court shall order, in addition to
any other penalty, the defendant to pay a one-hundred-dollar
assessment to be deposited in the Drug Abuse Education and Treatment
Req. No. 15314 Page 65

Revo lving Fund created in Section 2-503.2 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, upon collection.
L. Q. 1. When a person is eighteen (18) years of age or older,
and is the driver, operator, or person in physical control of a
vehicle, and is convicted of violating any provision of this section
while transporting or having in the motor vehicle any child less
than eighteen (18) years of age, the fine shall be enhanced to
double the amount of the fine imposed for the underlying driving
under the influence (DUI) violation which shall be in addition to
any other penalties allowed by this section.
2. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the prosecution of
a person pursuant to Section 852.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes who is in violation of any provision of this section or
Section 11-904 of this title.
M. R. Any plea of guilty, nolo contendere or finding of guilt
for a violation of this section or a violation pursuant to the
provisions of any law of this state or another state prohibiting the
offenses provided for in this section, Section 11-904 of this title,
or paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 852.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, shall constitute a conviction of the offense for
the purpose of this section; provided, any deferred judgment shall
only be considered to constitute a conviction for a period of ten
(10) years following the completion of any court-imposed
probationary term.
Req. No. 15314 Page 66

N. S. If qualified by knowledge, skill, experience, training or
education, a witness shall be allowed to testify in the form of an
opinion or otherwise solely on the issue of impairment, but not on
the issue of specific alcohol concentration level, relating to the
following:
1. The results of any standardized field sobriety test
including, but not limited to, the horizontal gaze nystagmus (HGN)
test administered by a person who has completed training in
standardized field sobriety testing; or
2. Whether a person was under the influence of one or more
impairing substances and the category of such impairing substance or
substances. A witness who has received training and holds a current
certification as a drug recognition expert shall be qualified to
give the testimony in any case in which such testimony may be
relevant.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-904, as
amended by Section 65, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 11-904), is amended to read as follows:
Section 11-904. A. Any person who is involved in a personal
injury accident while driving or operating a motor vehicle within
this state and who is in violation of the provisions of subsection A
or subsection B of Section 11-902 of this title may be charged with
a violation of the provisions of this subsection as follows:

Req. No. 15314 Page 67

1. Any person who is convicted of a violation of the provisions
of this subsection shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor for the
first offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county
jail for not less than ninety (90) days nor more than one (1) year,
and a fine of not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($2,500.00); and
2. Any person who is convicted of a violation of the provisions
of this subsection after having been previously convicted of a
violation of this subsection or of Section 11-902 of this title
shall be deemed guilty of a Class B5 felony offense and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for not less than one (1) year and not more than five
(5) years, and a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00).
B. 1. Any person who causes an accident resulting in great
bodily injury to any person other than himself while driving or
operating a motor vehicle within this state and who is in violation
of the provisions of subsection A or subsection B of Section 11-902
of this title may be charged with a violation of the provisions of
this subsection. Any person who is convicted of a violation of the
provisions of this subsection shall be deemed guilty of a Class B1
felony offense punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for not less than four (4) years and not

Req. No. 15314 Page 68

more than twenty (20) years, and a fine of not more than Five
Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).
2. As used in this subsection, "great bodily injury" means
bodily injury which creates a substantial risk of death or which
causes serious, permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or
impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-906.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 11-906.4. A. It is unlawful, and punishable as
provided in subsection B of this section, for any person under
twenty-one (21) years of age to drive, operate, or be in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state who:
1. Has any measurable quantity of alcohol in the person's blood
or breath at the time of a test administered within two (2) hours
after an arrest of the person;
2. Exhibits evidence of being under the influence of any other
intoxicating substance as shown by analysis of a specimen of the
person's blood, breath, saliva, or urine in accordance with the
provisions of Sections 752 and 759 of this title; or
3. Exhibits evidence of the combined influence of alcohol and
any other intoxicating substance.
B. Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age who violates
any provision of this section shall be subject to the seizure of the
driver license of that person at the time of arrest or detention and
Req. No. 15314 Page 69

the person, upon conviction, shall be guilty of operating or being
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the
influence while under age and shall be punished:
1. For a first conviction, by:
a. a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00)
nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00),
b. assignment to and completion of twenty (20) hours of
community service,
c. requiring the person to attend and complete a
treatment program, or
d. any combination of fine, community service, or
treatment;
2. Upon a second conviction, by:
a. assignment to and completion of not less than two
hundred forty (240) hours of community service, and
b. the requirement, after the conclusion of the mandatory
revocation period, to install an ignition interlock
device or devices, as provided by subparagraph n of
paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 991a of Title
22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for a period of not less
than thirty (30) days.
In addition, a second conviction may be punished by a fine of not
less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00), or by requiring the person to attend and
Req. No. 15314 Page 70

comp lete a treatment program, as recommended by the assessment
required pursuant to subparagraph c of paragraph 2 of subsection D
of this section, or by both; or
3. Upon a third or subsequent conviction, by:
a. assignment to and completion of not less than four
hundred eighty (480) hours of community service, and
b. the requirement, after the conclusion of the mandatory
revocation period, to install an ignition interlock
device or devices, as provided by subparagraph n of
paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 991a of Title
22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for a period of not less
than thirty (30) days.
In addition, a third or subsequent conviction may be punished by a
fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than
Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), or by requiring the person to
attend and complete a treatment program, as recommended by the
assessment required pursuant to subparagraph c of paragraph 2 of
subsection D of this section, or by both.
C. The court may assess additional community service hours in
lieu of any fine specified in this section.
D. In addition to any penalty or condition imposed pursuant to
the provisions of this section, the person shall be subject to:
1. Upon a first conviction:

Req. No. 15314 Page 71

a. the cancellation or denial of driving privileges as
ordered by the court pursuant to subsection B of
Section 6-107.1 of this title,
b. the mandatory revocation of driving privileges
pursuant to Section 6-205.1, 753 or 754 of this title,
which revocation period may be modified as provided by
law, and
c. the continued installation of an ignition interlock
device or devices, at the expense of the person, as
provided in subsection D of Section 6-212.3 of this
title, after the mandatory period of cancellation,
denial or revocation for a period as provided in
paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 6-212.3 of this
title;
2. Upon a second conviction:
a. the cancellation or denial of driving privileges, as
ordered by the court pursuant to subsection B of
Section 6-107.2 of this title,
b. the mandatory revocation of driving privileges
pursuant to Section 6-205.1, 753 or 754 of this title,
which period may be modified as provided by law,
c. an assessment of the person's degree of alcohol abuse,
in the same manner as prescribed in subsection H M of

Req. No. 15314 Page 72

Section 11-902 of this title, which may result in
treatment as deemed appropriate by the court, and
d. the continued installation of an ignition interlock
device or devices, at the expense of the person, as
provided in subsection D of Section 6-212.3 of this
title, after the mandatory period of cancellation,
denial or revocation for a period as provided in
paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 6-212.3 of this
title; and
3. Upon a third or subsequent conviction:
a. the cancellation or denial of driving privileges as
ordered by the court pursuant to subsection B of
Section 6-107.2 of this title,
b. the mandatory revocation of driving privileges
pursuant to Section 6-205.1, 753 or 754 of this title,
which period may be modified as provided by law,
c. an assessment of the person's degree of alcohol abuse,
in the same manner as prescribed in subsection H M of
Section 11-902 of this title, which may result in
treatment as deemed appropriate by the court, and
d. the continued installation of an ignition interlock
device or devices, at the expense of the person, as
provided in subsection D of Section 6-212.3 of this
title, after the mandatory period of cancellation,
Req. No. 15314 Page 73

denial, or revocation for a period as provided in
paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 6-212.3 of this
title.
E. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the
filing of charges pursuant to Section 761 or 11-902 of this title
when the facts warrant.
F. As used in this section:
1. The term "conviction" includes a juvenile delinquency
adjudication by a court; and
2. The term "revocation" includes the cancellation or denial of
driving privileges by the Department.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15314 JBH 12/16/25










Req. No. 15314 Page 74